North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 3. Clients’ Rights and Advance Instruction.
§ 122C-62.
Additional rights in 24-hour facilities. [Effective January 1, 2023]

In addition to the rights enumerated in

G.S. 122C-51

through

G.S. 122C-61

, each adult client who is receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility keeps the right to:

Send and receive sealed mail and have access to writing material, postage, and staff assistance when necessary;

Contact and consult with, at his own expense and at no cost to the facility, legal counsel, private physicians, and private mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse professionals of his choice; and

Contact and consult with a client advocate if there is a client advocate.

The rights specified in this subsection may not be restricted by the facility and each adult client may exercise these rights at all reasonable times.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (h) of this section, each adult client who is receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility at all times keeps the right to:

Make and receive confidential telephone calls. All long distance calls shall be paid for by the client at the time of making the call or made collect to the receiving party;

Receive visitors between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m. for a period of at least six hours daily, two hours of which shall be after 6:00 p.m.; however visiting shall not take precedence over therapies;

Communicate and meet under appropriate supervision with individuals of his own choice upon the consent of the individuals;

Make visits outside the custody of the facility unless:

Commitment proceedings were initiated as the result of the client’s being charged with a violent crime, including a crime involving an assault with a deadly weapon, and the respondent was found not guilty by reason of insanity or incapable of proceeding;

The client was voluntarily admitted or committed to the facility while under order of commitment to a correctional facility of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction; or

The client is being held to determine capacity to proceed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

;

A court order may expressly authorize visits otherwise prohibited by the existence of the conditions prescribed by this subdivision;

Be out of doors daily and have access to facilities and equipment for physical exercise several times a week;

Except as prohibited by law, keep and use personal clothing and possessions, unless the client is being held to determine capacity to proceed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

;

Participate in religious worship;

Keep and spend a reasonable sum of his own money;

Retain a driver’s license, unless otherwise prohibited by Chapter 20 of the General Statutes; and

Have access to individual storage space for his private use.

In addition to the rights enumerated in

G.S. 122C-51

through

G.S. 122C-57

and

G.S. 122C-59

through

G.S. 122C-61

, each minor client who is receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility has the right to have access to proper adult supervision and guidance. In recognition of the minor’s status as a developing individual, the minor shall be provided opportunities to enable him to mature physically, emotionally, intellectually, socially, and vocationally. In view of the physical, emotional, and intellectual immaturity of the minor, the 24-hour facility shall provide appropriate structure, supervision and control consistent with the rights given to the minor pursuant to this Part. The facility shall also, where practical, make reasonable efforts to ensure that each minor client receives treatment apart and separate from adult clients unless the treatment needs of the minor client dictate otherwise.Each minor client who is receiving treatment or habilitation from a 24-hour facility has the right to:

Communicate and consult with his parents or guardian or the agency or individual having legal custody of him;

Contact and consult with, at his own expense or that of his legally responsible person and at no cost to the facility, legal counsel, private physicians, private mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse professionals, of his or his legally responsible person’s choice; and

Contact and consult with a client advocate, if there is a client advocate.

The rights specified in this subsection may not be restricted by the facility and each minor client may exercise these rights at all reasonable times.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (h) of this section, each minor client who is receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility has the right to:

Make and receive telephone calls. All long distance calls shall be paid for by the client at the time of making the call or made collect to the receiving party;

Send and receive mail and have access to writing materials, postage, and staff assistance when necessary;

Under appropriate supervision, receive visitors between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m. for a period of at least six hours daily, two hours of which shall be after 6:00 p.m.; however visiting shall not take precedence over school or therapies;

Receive special education and vocational training in accordance with federal and State law;

Be out of doors daily and participate in play, recreation, and physical exercise on a regular basis in accordance with his needs;

Except as prohibited by law, keep and use personal clothing and possessions under appropriate supervision, unless the client is being held to determine capacity to proceed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

;

Participate in religious worship;

Have access to individual storage space for the safekeeping of personal belongings;

Have access to and spend a reasonable sum of his own money; and

Retain a driver’s license, unless otherwise prohibited by Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.

No right enumerated in subsections (b) or (d) of this section may be limited or restricted except by the qualified professional responsible for the formulation of the client’s treatment or habilitation plan. A written statement shall be placed in the client’s record that indicates the detailed reason for the restriction. The restriction shall be reasonable and related to the client’s treatment or habilitation needs. A restriction is effective for a period not to exceed 30 days. An evaluation of each restriction shall be conducted by the qualified professional at least every seven days, at which time the restriction may be removed. Each evaluation of a restriction shall be documented in the client’s record. Restrictions on rights may be renewed only by a written statement entered by the qualified professional in the client’s record that states the reason for the renewal of the restriction. In the case of an adult client who has not been adjudicated incompetent, in each instance of an initial restriction or renewal of a restriction of rights, an individual designated by the client shall, upon the consent of the client, be notified of the restriction and of the reason for it. In the case of a minor client or an incompetent adult client, the legally responsible person shall be notified of each instance of an initial restriction or renewal of a restriction of rights and of the reason for it. Notification of the designated individual or legally responsible person shall be documented in writing in the client’s record.

The Commission may adopt rules to implement subsection (e) of this section.

With regard to clients being held to determine capacity to proceed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1002

or clients in a facility for substance abuse, and notwithstanding the prior provisions of this section, the Commission may adopt rules restricting the rights set forth under (b)(2), (b)(3), and (d)(3) of this section if restrictions are necessary and reasonable in order to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the client involved or other clients.

The rights stated in subdivisions (b)(2), (b)(4), (b)(5), (b)(10), (d)(3), (d)(5) and (d)(8) may be modified in a general hospital by that hospital to be the same as for other patients in that hospital; provided that any restriction of a specific client’s rights shall be done in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this section.

History.

1973, c. 475, s. 1; c. 1436, ss. 2-5, 8; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 10; 1995, c. 299, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 27; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(lllll); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

§ 122C-63.
Assurance for continuity of care for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

Any individual with an intellectual disability admitted for residential care or treatment for other than respite or emergency care to any residential facility operated under the authority of this Chapter and supported all or in part by State-appropriated funds has the right to residential placement in an alternative facility if the client is in need of placement and if the original facility can no longer provide the necessary care or treatment.

The operator of a residential facility providing residential care or treatment, for other than respite or emergency care, for individuals with intellectual disabilities shall notify the area authority serving the client’s county of residence of the operator’s intent to close a facility or to discharge a client who may be in need of continuing care at least 60 days prior to the closing or discharge.The operator’s notification to the area authority of intent to close a facility or to discharge a client who may be in need of continuing care constitutes the operator’s acknowledgement of the obligation to continue to serve the client until whichever of the following occurs first:

The area authority determines that the client is not in need of continuing care.

The client is moved to an alternative residential placement.

Sixty days have elapsed.In cases in which the safety of the client who may be in need of continuing care, of other clients, of the staff of the residential facility, or of the general public, is concerned, this 60-day notification period may be waived by securing an emergency placement in a more secure and safe facility. The operator of the residential facility shall notify the area authority that an emergency placement has been arranged within 24 hours of the placement. The area authority and the Secretary shall retain their respective responsibilities upon receipt of this notice.

An individual who may be in need of continuing care may be discharged from a residential facility without further claim for continuing care against the area authority or the State if any of the following is true:

After the parent or guardian, if the client is a minor or an adjudicated incompetent adult, or the client, if an adult not adjudicated incompetent, has entered into a contract with the operator upon the client’s admission to the original residential facility, the parent, guardian, or client who entered into the contract refuses to carry out the contract.

After an alternative placement for a client in need of continuing care is located, the parent or guardian who admitted the client to the residential facility, if the client is a minor or an adjudicated incompetent adult, or the client, if the client is an adult not adjudicated incompetent, refuses the alternative placement.

Decisions made by the area authority regarding the need for continued placement or regarding the availability of an alternative placement of a client may be appealed pursuant to the appeals process of the area authority and subsequently to the Secretary or the Commission under their rules. If the appeal process extends beyond the operator’s 60-day obligation to continue to serve the client, the Secretary shall arrange a temporary placement in a State developmental center pending the outcome of the appeal.

The area authority that serves the county of residence of the client is responsible for assessing the need for continuity of care and for the coordination of the placement among available public and private facilities whenever the authority is notified that a client may be in need of continuing care. If an alternative placement is not available beyond the operator’s 60-day obligation to continue to serve the client, the Secretary shall arrange for a temporary placement in a State developmental center. The area authority shall retain responsibility for coordination of placement during a temporary placement in a State developmental center.

The Secretary is responsible for coordinative and financial assistance to the area authority in the performing of its duties to coordinate placement so as to assure continuity of care and for assuring a continuity of care placement beyond the operator’s 60-day obligation period.

The area authority’s financial responsibility, through local and allocated State resources, is limited to the following:

Costs relating to the identification and coordination of alternative placements.

If the original facility is an area facility, maintenance of the client in the original facility for up to 60 days.

Release of allocated categorical State funds used to support the care or treatment of the specific client at the time of alternative placement if the Secretary requires the release.

In accordance with G.S. 143B-147(a)(1) the Commission shall develop programmatic rules to implement this section, and, in accordance with G.S. 122C-112(a)(6), the Secretary shall adopt budgetary rules to implement this section.

History.

1981, c. 1012; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2019-76, s. 3.

§ 122C-64.
Client rights and human rights committees.

Client rights and human rights committees responsible for protecting the rights of clients shall be established at each State facility, for each local management entity, and provider agency. The Commission shall adopt rules for the establishment, composition, and duties of the committees and procedures for appointment and coordination with the State and Local Consumer Advocacy programs. The membership of the client rights and human rights committee for a multicounty program or local management entity shall include a representative from each of the participating counties.

History.

1985-589, s. 2; 2001-437, s. 1.3; 2009-190, s. 1.

§ 122C-65.
Offenses relating to clients.

For the protection of clients receiving treatment or habilitation in a 24-hour facility, it is unlawful for any individual who is not a developmentally disabled client in a facility:

To assist, advise, or solicit, or to offer to assist, advise, or solicit a client of a facility to leave without authority;

To transport or to offer to transport a client of a facility to or from any place without the facility’s authority;

To receive or to offer to receive a minor client of a facility into any place, structure, building, or conveyance for the purpose of engaging in any act that would constitute a sex offense, or to solicit a minor client of a facility to engage in any act that would constitute a sex offense;

To hide an individual who has left a facility without authority; or

To engage in, or offer to engage in an act with a client of a facility that would constitute a sex offense.

Violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 53; Rev., s. 3694; C.S., s. 6171; 1963, c. 1184, ss. 1, 6; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 11; 1993, c. 539, s. 921; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 122C-66.
Protection from abuse and exploitation; reporting.

An employee of or a volunteer at a facility who, other than as a part of generally accepted medical or therapeutic procedure, knowingly causes pain or injury to a client is guilty of a Class A1 misdemeanor. Any employee or volunteer who uses reasonable force to carry out the provisions of

G.S. 122C-60

or to protect himself or others from a violent client does not violate this subsection.

(a1)

An employee of or a volunteer at a facility who borrows or takes personal property from a client is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any employee or volunteer who uses reasonable force to carry out the provisions of

G.S. 122C-60

or to protect himself or others from a violent client does not violate this subsection.

An employee of or a volunteer at a facility who witnesses or has knowledge of a violation of subsection (a), subsection (a1), or of an accidental injury to a client shall report the violation or accidental injury to authorized personnel designated by the facility. No employee making a report may be threatened or harassed by any other employee or volunteer on account of the report. Violation of this subsection is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

(b1)

The employee of or a volunteer at a facility who witnesses a client become a victim of a violation of Article 7A or Article 26 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes shall report the allegations within 24 hours after witnessing the violation to one of the following: (i) the department of social services in the county where the facility serves the client; (ii) the district attorney in the district where the facility serves the client; or (iii) the appropriate local law enforcement agency in the city or county where the facility serves the client. A violation of this section is a Class A1 misdemeanor. No employee making a report may be threatened or harassed by any other employee or volunteer on account of the report.

The identity of an individual who makes a report under this section or who cooperates in an ensuing investigation may not be disclosed without the reporting individual’s consent, except to persons authorized by the facility or by State or federal law to investigate or prosecute these incidents, or in a grievance or personnel hearing or civil or criminal action in which the reporting individual is testifying, or when disclosure is legally compelled or authorized by judicial discovery. This subsection shall not be interpreted to require the disclosure of the identity of an individual where it is otherwise prohibited by law.

An employee who makes a report in good faith under this section is immune from any civil liability that might otherwise occur for the report. In any case involving liability, making of a report under this section is prima facie evidence that the maker acted in good faith.

The duty imposed by this section is in addition to any duty imposed by

G.S. 7B-301

or

G.S. 108A-102

.

Except for reports made pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section, the facility shall investigate or provide for the investigation of all reports made under the provisions of this section.

The county department of social services and the district attorney to whom a report is made under subsection (b1) of this section shall investigate or provide for the investigation of each such report.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, ss. 922, 923; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-202, s. 13(ee); 2015-36, s. 2.

§ 122C-67.
Other rules regarding abuse, exploitation, neglect not prohibited.

G.S. 122C-66

does not prohibit the Commission from adopting rules for State and area facilities and does not prohibit other facilities from issuing policies regarding other forms of prohibited abuse, exploitation, or neglect.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2.

§§ 122C-68 through 122C-70.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Advance Instruction for Mental Health Treatment.

§ 122C-71.
Purpose.

The General Assembly recognizes as a matter of public policy the fundamental right of an individual to control the decisions relating to the individual’s mental health care.

The purpose of this Part is to establish an additional, nonexclusive method for an individual to exercise the right to consent to or refuse mental health treatment when the individual lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate mental health treatment decisions.

This Part is intended and shall be construed to be consistent with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 32A of the General Statutes, provided that in the event of a conflict between the provisions of this Part and Article 3 of Chapter 32A, the provisions of this Part control.

History.

1997-442, s. 2; 1998-198, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

See legislative survey, 21 Campbell L. Rev. 323 (1999).

For note, “Double Secret Protection:
Bridging Federal and State Law to Protect Privacy Rights for Telemental and Mobile Health Users,”
see 67 Duke L.J. 1115 (2018).

§ 122C-72.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following terms have the meanings specified:

“Advance instruction for mental health treatment” or “advance instruction” means a written instrument, signed in the presence of two qualified witnesses who believe the principal to be of sound mind at the time of the signing, and acknowledged before a notary public, pursuant to which the principal makes a declaration of instructions, information, and preferences regarding the principal’s mental health treatment and states that the principal is aware that the advance instruction authorizes a mental health treatment provider to act according to the instruction. It may also state the principal’s instructions regarding, but not limited to, consent to or refusal of mental health treatment when the principal is incapable.

“Attending physician” means the physician who has primary responsibility for the care and treatment of the principal.

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-198, s. 2, effective October 1, 1998.

“Incapable” means that, in the opinion of a physician or eligible psychologist, the person currently lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make and communicate mental health treatment decisions. As used in this Part, the term “eligible psychologist” has the meaning given in G.S. 122C-3(13d).

“Mental health treatment” means the process of providing for the physical, emotional, psychological, and social needs of the principal for the principal’s mental illness. “Mental health treatment” includes, but is not limited to, electroconvulsive treatment (ECT), commonly referred to as “shock treatment”, treatment of mental illness with psychotropic medication, and admission to and retention in a facility for care or treatment of mental illness.

“Principal” means the person making the advance instruction.

“Qualified witness” means a witness who affirms that the principal is personally known to the witness, that the principal signed or acknowledged the principal’s signature on the advance instruction in the presence of the witness, that the witness believes the principal to be of sound mind and not to be under duress, fraud, or undue influence, and that the witness is not:

The attending physician or mental health service provider or an employee of the physician or mental health treatment provider;

An owner, operator, or employee of an owner or operator of a health care facility in which the principal is a patient or resident; or

Related within the third degree to the principal or to the principal’s spouse.

History.

1997-442, s. 2; 1998-198, s. 2.

§ 122C-73.
Scope, use, and authority of advance instruction for mental health treatment.

Any adult of sound mind may make an advance instruction regarding mental health treatment. The advance instruction may include consent to or refusal of mental health treatment.

An advance instruction may include, but is not limited to, the names and telephone numbers of individuals to be contacted in case of a mental health crisis, situations that may cause the principal to experience a mental health crisis, responses that may assist the principal to remain in the principal’s home during a mental health crisis, the types of assistance that may help stabilize the principal if it becomes necessary to enter a facility, and medications that the principal is taking or has taken in the past and the effects of those medications.

An individual shall not be required to execute or to refrain from executing an advance instruction as a condition for insurance coverage, as a condition for receiving mental or physical health services, as a condition for receiving privileges while in a facility, or as a condition of discharge from a facility.

(c1)

A principal, through an advance instruction, may grant or withhold authority for mental health treatment, including, but not limited to, the use of psychotropic medication, electroconvulsive treatment, and admission to and retention in a facility for the care or treatment of mental illness.

A principal may nominate, by advance instruction for mental health treatment, the guardian of the person of the principal if a guardianship proceeding is thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment in accordance with the principal’s most recent nomination in an unrevoked advance instruction for mental health treatment, except for good cause shown.

If, following the execution of an advance instruction for mental health treatment, a court of competent jurisdiction appoints a guardian of the person of the principal, or a general guardian with powers over the person of the principal, the guardian shall follow the advance instruction consistent with G.S. 35A-1201(a)(5).

An advance instruction for mental health treatment may be combined with a health care power of attorney or general power of attorney that is executed in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 32A or Chapter 32C of the General Statutes so long as each form shall be executed in accordance with its own statute.

History.

1997-442, s. 2; 1998-198, s. 2; 2017-153, s. 2.7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.7, effective January 1, 2018, inserted “or Chapter 32C” in subsection (f).

§ 122C-74.
Effectiveness and duration; revocation.

A validly executed advance instruction becomes effective upon its proper execution and remains valid unless revoked.

The attending physician or other mental health treatment provider may consider valid and rely upon an advance instruction, or a copy of that advance instruction that is obtained from the Advance Health Care Directive Registry maintained by the Secretary of State pursuant to Article 21 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes, in the absence of actual knowledge of its revocation or invalidity.

An attending physician or other mental health treatment provider may presume that a person who executed an advance instruction in accordance with this Part was of sound mind and acted voluntarily when he or she executed the advance instruction.

An attending physician or other mental health treatment provider shall act in accordance with an advance instruction when the principal has been determined to be incapable. If a patient is incapable, an advance instruction executed in accordance with this Article is presumed to be valid.

The attending physician or mental health treatment provider shall continue to obtain the principal’s informed consent to all mental health treatment decisions when the principal is capable of providing informed consent or refusal, as required by

G.S. 122C-57

. Unless the principal is deemed incapable by the attending physician or eligible psychologist, the instructions of the principal at the time of treatment shall supersede the declarations expressed in the principal’s advance instruction.

The fact of a principal’s having executed an advance instruction shall not be considered an indication of a principal’s capacity to make or communicate mental health treatment decisions at such times as those decisions are required.

Upon being presented with an advance instruction, an attending physician or other mental health treatment provider shall make the advance instruction a part of the principal’s medical record. When acting under authority of an advance instruction, an attending physician or other mental health treatment provider shall comply with the advance instruction unless:

Compliance, in the opinion of the attending physician or other mental health treatment provider, is not consistent with generally accepted community practice standards of treatment to benefit the principal;

Compliance is not consistent with the availability of treatments requested;

Compliance is not consistent with applicable law;

The principal is committed to a 24-hour facility pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, and treatment is authorized in compliance with

G.S. 122C-57

and rules adopted pursuant to it; or

Compliance, in the opinion of the attending physician or other mental health treatment provider, is not consistent with appropriate treatment in case of an emergency endangering life or health.

In the event that one part of the advance instruction is unable to be followed because of one or more of the above, all other parts of the advance instruction shall nonetheless be followed.

If the attending physician or other mental health treatment provider is unwilling at any time to comply with any part or parts of an advance instruction for one or more of the reasons set out in subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection (g), the attending physician or other mental health care treatment provider shall promptly notify the principal and, if applicable, the health care agent and shall document the reason for not complying with the advance instruction and shall document the notification in the principal’s medical record.

An advance instruction does not limit any authority provided in Article 5 of G.S. 122C either to take a person into custody, or to admit, retain, or treat a person in a facility.

An advance instruction may be revoked at any time by the principal so long as the principal is not incapable. The principal may exercise this right of revocation in any manner by which the principal is able to communicate an intent to revoke and by notifying the revocation to the treating physician or other mental health treatment provider. The attending physician or other mental health treatment provider shall note the revocation as part of the principal’s medical record.

History.

1997-442, s. 2; 1998-198, s. 2; 2001-455, s. 5; 2001-513, s. 30(b).

§ 122C-75.
Reliance on advance instruction for mental health treatment.

An attending physician or eligible psychologist who in good faith determines that the principal is or is not incapable for the purpose of deciding whether to proceed or not to proceed according to an advance instruction, is not subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or professional disciplinary action for making and acting upon that determination.

In the absence of actual knowledge of the revocation of an advance instruction, no attending physician or other mental health treatment provider shall be subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability or be deemed to have engaged in unprofessional conduct as a result of the provision of treatment to a principal in accordance with this Part unless the absence of actual knowledge resulted from the negligence of the attending physician or mental health treatment provider.

An attending physician or mental health treatment provider who administers or does not administer mental health treatment according to and in good faith reliance upon the validity of an advance instruction is not subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or professional disciplinary action resulting from a subsequent finding of an advance instruction’s invalidity.

No attending physician or mental health treatment provider who administers or does not administer treatment under authorization obtained pursuant to this Part shall incur liability arising out of a claim to the extent that the claim is based on lack of informed consent or authorization for this action.

This section shall not be construed as affecting or limiting any liability that arises out of a negligent act or omission in connection with the medical diagnosis, care, or treatment of a principal under an advance instruction or that arises out of any deviation from reasonable medical standards.

History.

1997-442, s. 2; 1998-198, s. 2.

§ 122C-76.
Penalty.

It is a Class 2 misdemeanor for a person, without authorization of the principal, willfully to alter, forge, conceal, or destroy an instrument, the reinstatement or revocation of an instrument, or any other evidence or document reflecting the principal’s desires and interests, with the intent or effect of affecting a mental health treatment decision.

History.

1997-442, s. 2.